en: brewer's yeast
bg: бирена мая
cs: pekarské drozdi
de: Bierhefe
es: levadura de cerveza
fi: panimohiiva, oluthiiva
fr: levure de bière
hr: pivski kvasac
hu: sörélesztő
it: lievito di birra
la: Saccharomyces cerevisiae
nl: biergist
pl: drożdże winiarskie Saccharomyces Cerevisiae, drożdże Saccharomyces Cerevisiae, drożdże piwowarskie, drożdże piwne
pt: levedura de cerveja
sv: bryggerijäst

en: torula yeast
de: Torula-Hefe
fr: levure torula
hr: torula kvasac
it: Lievito torula
la: Cyberlindnera jadinii, Candida utilis

en: hops yeast
hr: hmelj kvasac
it: lievito di luppolo

en: yeast extract
bg: екстракт от мая, екстракти от мая
bs: ekstrakt kvasca
ca: Extracte de llevat
cs: Výtažek z kvasnic, kvasnicový extrakt, kvasničný extrakt
da: gærekstrakt
de: Hefeextrakt
el: εκχύλισμα μαιάς
es: extracto de levadura
et: pärmiekstrakt
fi: hiivauute
fr: extrait de levure, extrait de levures, extraits de levure
hu: élesztőkivonat
is: gerseyði
it: estratto di lievito
ja: 酵母エキス
lt: mielių ekstraktas, mieliu ekstraktas
lv: rauga ekstrakts
nb: gjærekstrakt
nl: gistextract
nn: gjærekstrakt
pl: ekstrakt drożdżowy, ekstrakt z drożdży
pt: extrato de levedura, extracto de levedura
ro: extract de drojdie, extract din drojdie
ru: Дрожжевой экстракт
sk: extrakt z droždia
sl: izvlecek kvasa, kvasni ekstrakt
sv: jästextrakt
tr: maya özütü
uk: Екстракт дріжджів
zh: 酵母抽提物

en: yeast extract powder
de: Hefeextraktpulver
es: extracto de levadura en polvo
fi: Hiivauutejauhe
fr: extrait de levure en poudre
hr: ekstrakt kvasca u prahu
it: estratto di lievito in polvere
ja: 酵母エキスパウダー
nl: gistextractpoeder
ru: дрожжи хлебопекарные сухие

en: autolyzed yeast extract, autolysed yeast extract
de: autolysierter Hefeextrakt
es: extracto de levadura autolizada, extracto autolizado de levadura
fr: extrait de levure autolysée
hr: autolizirani ekstrakt kvasca
it: Estratto di lievito autolizzato

en: yeast extract aroma, yeast extract flavour
it: aroma di estratto di lievito
pl: aromat z ekstraktu drożdżowego, aromat ekstraktu drożdżowego

en: sourdough, sour dough
an: Emprenyatuera
ar: خبز عجينة متخمرة
bg: Квас
ca: Massa mare
cs: Kvásek
da: surdej
de: Sauerteig
eo: Acidpasto
es: Masa madre
fa: نان خمیر ترش
fi: taikinajuuri, taikinanjuuri, hapantaikina, hapanjuuri
fr: levain, levain naturel, levain panaire
he: מחמצת שאור
hr: kiselo tijesto
hu: Kovász
id: Adonan asam
is: Súrdeig
ja: サワードウ
ko: 사워도
lt: raugas
nb: surdeig
nl: zuurdesem, zuurdeeg, desem
nn: surdeig
pl: Zakwas chlebowy, zakwas, zakwasu, zakwas piekarski
pt: massa lêveda, massa fermentada
ru: Хлебная закваска
sh: Кисело тесто
sk: Kvások
sr: Кисело тесто
sv: surdeg
zh: 老麵

en: natural sourdough
da: naturlig surdej
de: Natursauerteig
hr: prirodno kiselo tijesto
it: lievito madre naturale
pl: zakwas naturalny

en: dehydrated sourdough
da: dehydreret surdej
de: Sauerteig getrocknet
fi: kuivattu taikinajuuri
fr: levain sec, levain déshydraté
hr: dehidrirano kiselo tijesto
it: lievito naturale secco
pl: zakwas w proszku, sproszkowany zakwas

en: sourdough powder
da: surdejspulver
nl: zuurdesempoeder, desempoeder
sv: surdegspulver

en: devitalised sourdough
fr: levain dévitalisé

en: dehydrated and devitalised sourdough
fr: levain déshydraté et dévitalisé
hr: devitalizirano i dehidrirano kiselo tijesto
it: pasta madre devitalizzata e disidratata
nl: geïnactiveerde desempoeder

en: wheat sourdough
bg: пшенична закваска, пшеничен квас
ca: massa mare de blat
cs: pšeničny kvas, pšeničný kvas
da: hvedesurdej
de: Weizensauerteig
es: masa madre de trigo
fi: vehnätaikinanjuuri, vehnähapantaikina
fr: levain de blé, levain panaire de blé
hr: pšenično kiselo tijesto
it: lievito madre di frumento
lt: kviečių raugas, kvietiniai raugas, kvietinės raugas, kvietinis raugas
nb: surdeig av hvete
nl: tarwe zuurdesem, tarwedesem, tarwezuurdesem
pl: zakwas pszenny
sv: vetesurdeg, surdeg av vete, surdeg på vete

en: natural wheat sourdough
ca: massa mare natural de blat
da: naturlig hvedesurdej
es: masa madre natural de trigo

en: dehydrated wheat sourdough, dried wheat sourdough
es: masa madre deshidratada de trigo
fi: kuivattu vehnätaikinanjuuri
fr: levain de blé déshydraté
it: pasta madre di grano essiccata
lt: sausas kviečių raugas, sausas kvietiniai raugas, sausas kvietinės raugas, sausas kvietinis raugas
nl: gedroogde tarwezuurdesem
pl: suszony zakwas pszenny, suchy zakwas pszenny

en: wheat sourdough powder
da: hvedesurdejspulver
sv: surdegspulver av vete

en: devitalised wheat sourdough
fr: levain de blé dévitalisé
nl: geïnactiveerd tarwedesem

en: durum wheat sourdough
hr: pšenično durum kiselo tijesto
it: lievito di grano duro

en: rye sourdough
bg: ръжена закваска
da: rugsurdej
de: Roggensauerteig, Sauerteig dunkel
es: masa madre de centeno
fi: ruistaikinanjuuri, ruisjuuri
fr: levain de seigle
hr: raženo kiselo tijesto
it: pasta madre di segale
nl: roggezuurdesem, roggedesem
pl: zakwas żytni
sv: rågsurdeg, surdeg av råg